myspell/de_DE.aff
# for comparative forms of adjectives: 
SFX C Y 80                                                       
SFX C   0       ere        [^elr]                                # neu > neuere 
SFX C   0       erer       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       eren       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       erem       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       eres       [^elr]  
SFX C   0       re         e                                     # prüde > prüdere 
SFX C   0       rer        e     
SFX C   0       ren        e     
SFX C   0       rem        e     
SFX C   0       res        e     
SFX C   0       ere        [^e][lr]                              # schmal > schmale 
SFX C   0       erer       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   0       eren       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   0       erem       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   0       eres       [^e][lr]       
SFX C   er      rere       uer                                   # teuer > teurere 
SFX C   er      rerer      uer   
SFX C   er      reren      uer   
SFX C   er      rerem      uer   
SFX C   er      reres      uer   
SFX C   0       ere        [^u]er                                # schwer > schwerere 
SFX C   0       erer       [^u]er        
SFX C   0       eren       [^u]er        
SFX C   0       erem       [^u]er        
SFX C   0       eres       [^u]er        
SFX C   lig     eligere    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adeligere 
SFX C   lig     eligerer   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligeren   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligerem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligeres   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   erig    rigere     [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrigere 
SFX C   erig    rigerer    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigeren    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigerem    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigeres    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   0       este       [kßsuxz]                              # neu > neueste 
SFX C   0       ester      [kßsuxz]     
SFX C   0       esten      [kßsuxz]                              # mies > miesesten 
SFX C   0       estem      [kßsuxz]                              # lax > laxestem 
SFX C   0       estes      [kßsuxz]                              # spitz > spitzestes 
SFX C   0       este       ss     
SFX C   0       ester      ss     
SFX C   0       esten      ss     
SFX C   0       estem      ss     
SFX C   0       estes      ss     
SFX C   0       ste        et                                    # geeignet > geeignetste 
SFX C   0       ster       et     
SFX C   0       sten       et     
SFX C   0       stem       et     
SFX C   0       stes       et     
SFX C   0       este       [^e]t                                 # matt > matteste 
SFX C   0       ester      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       esten      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       estem      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       estes      [^e]t  
SFX C   0       ste        [^kßstxz]                             # teuer > teuerste 
SFX C   0       ster       [^kßstxz]                             # dick > dickster 
SFX C   0       sten       [^kßstxz]                             # lahm > lahmsten 
SFX C   0       stem       [^kßstxz]                             # teuer > teuerstem 
SFX C   0       stes       [^kßstxz]                             # teuer > teuerstes 
SFX C   0       ste        nd                                    # wohlhabend > wohlhabendste 
SFX C   0       ster       nd     
SFX C   0       sten       nd     
SFX C   0       stem       nd     
SFX C   0       stes       nd     
SFX C   0       este       [^n]d                                 # wild > wildeste 
SFX C   0       ester      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       esten      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       estem      [^n]d  
SFX C   0       estes      [^n]d  
SFX C   lig     eligste    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig                     # adlig > adeligste 
SFX C   lig     eligster   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligsten   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligstem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   lig     eligstes   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig 
SFX C   erig    rigste     [^hi]erig                             # zitterig > zittrig 
SFX C   erig    rigster    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigsten    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigstem    [^hi]erig   
SFX C   erig    rigstes    [^hi]erig   
 
# a few 'catch all' plural forms: 
# All plurals seem to boil down to one of 'N', 'E', 'P' or 'Q' 
# (or are 'irregular') 
 
 
SFX E Y 1 
SFX E   0       e          .                                     # Wind > Winde 
 
 
SFX f Y 4 
SFX f   ph      f          ph                                    # Paragraph > Paragraf 
SFX f   ph      fen        ph     
SFX f   phie    fie        phie                                  # Typographie > Typografie #nn 
SFX f   phie    fien       phie                                  #nn 
 
 
SFX N Y 1
SFX N   0       n          .                                     # Lampe > Lampen 
 
 
SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0       en         .                                     # Tat > Taten 
 
 
# this is for some irregular plural forms with vowel -> umlaut conversions 
SFX p Y 23
SFX p   auf     äufe      auf                                    # Lauf > Läufe 
SFX p   auf     äufen     auf   
SFX p   aus     äuser     haus                                   # Haus > Häuser 
SFX p   aus     äusern    haus 
SFX p   arkt    ärkte     markt                                  # Markt > Märkte 
SFX p   arkt    ärkten    markt       
SFX p   ang     änge      ang                                    # Gang > Gänge 
SFX p   ang     ängen     ang                                    # Gruß > Grüße #swiss-del 
SFX p   uß      üßen      uß                                     #swiss-del 
SFX p   oß      öße       oß                                     # Stoß > Stöße #swiss-convert 
SFX p   oß      ößen      oß                                     #swiss-convert 
SFX p   aum     äume      aum                                    # Raum > Räume 
SFX p   aum     äumen     aum   
SFX p   ag      äge       ag                                     # Betrag > Beträge 
SFX p   ag      ägen      ag                                     # Zug > Züge 
SFX p   ug      üge       ug     
SFX p   ug      ügen      ug     
SFX p   all     älle      all   
SFX p   all     ällen     all   
SFX p   ass     ässe      ass                                    # Pass > Pässe 
SFX p   ass     ässen     ass    
SFX p   uss     üsse      uss                                    # Nuss > Nüsse 
SFX p   uss     üssen     uss    

#  be carefull with Erlass, Fass, Hass, Kompass, ???, 
#  Stuss, ..druss, ???        ... they don't pluralize via the /p flag ! 
 
 
SFX R Y 3 
SFX R   0       er         [^e]                                  # Licht > Lichter 
SFX R   0       ern        [^e]    
SFX R   0       r          e                                     # Beamte > Beamter 
 
 
SFX S Y 1 
SFX S   0       s          .                                     # Wolfgang > Wolfgangs 
 
# for feminin nouns who don't have -SSES like Erlaubnisses
SFX q Y 2    
SFX q   s       sse        s                                     # Erlaubnis > Erlaubnisse 
SFX q   s       ssen       s                                     # Erlaubnis > Erlaubnissen 
 
 
SFX Q Y 3 
SFX Q   s       sse        s                                     # Geheimnis > Geheimnisse 
SFX Q   s       ssen       s                                     # Geheimnis > Geheimnissen 
SFX Q   s       sses       s                                     # Geheimnis > Geheimnisses 
 
 
######## 
 
# Genitiv seperate -s and -es, many words may take them both! (Muts, Mutes) 
SFX T Y 1 
SFX T   0       es         .                                     # Platz > Platzes 

 
