myspell/de_DE.dic
Abtreibungsparagraph/Pf
Adelung/P
Ahorn/S
Akademiemitglied/RST
Aktienertrag/STp
Albatros/Q
Altersschwäche/N
Altmetall/EPS
am/P
Amtsblatt/T
Anerkenntnis/q
Ankaufkredit/EPST
Anlagepapier/EPS
Anschlusszug/TSp
Arbeitspapier/EPS
Arbeitstext/EPST
Arbeitsunterlage/N
Arbeitszeit/P
ärmlich/AC
Armutszeugnis/Q
Äthiopier/FNS
Aufenthaltserlaubnis/q
Aufgabenfeld/RST
Aufgang/STp
Ausgehverbot/EPT
Ausnahmefall/STp
Autobiographie/Nf
Autorenrecht/E
Backpulver/S
Bad/T
Bahnbeamte/NR
Banane/N
Bedrängnis/q
Beeinflussung/P
begehrenswert/AC
Beichtgeheimnis/Q
Bekümmernis/q
Berufungsgericht/EPST
Bestechungsgeld/RST
Beteiligungsertrag/STp
Betriebsabteilung/P
Betriebsertrag/STp
Betriebsgeheimnis/Q
Betrübnis/q
Bezugspreis/EPT
Bibliographie/Nf
Bienenzüchter/FNS
Biographie/Nf
Bitternis/q
Blutbild/RST
Bootparameter/SN
Brokerhaus/Tp
Bücherregal/EPS
Bühnenbild/RST
Bundeslandwirtschaftsminister/NS
Büroangestellte/RN
Bürokenntnis/q
Bus/Q
Carotinoid/EPS
charakterlos/AC
Chip/S
Christbaum/STp
Datenschutzbeauftragte/RN
Dialekt/EPST
Dienst/EPTV
Dienstmädchen/S
Doppelsinn/EPS
Dörfer/N
Dreiecksverhältnis/Q
Druckerlaubnis/q
Durchmarscherlaubnis/q
Effektenmarkt/STp
Eigenfabrikat/EPT
Eigengewicht/EPST
einfältig/AC
Einverständnis/Q
Eiweißmolekül/E
Elektronik/PR
Empfängnis/q
Ende/NS
Entschädigungsleistung/P
Entscheidungsmuster/S
Erbfeind/EPT
Erkenntnis/q
Erkundungsflug/STp
Erlebnis/Q
Ermittlungsbefugnis/q
Ersparnis/q
ersprießlich/ACU
Exploration/P
Fachbericht/EPST
Fachkenntnis/q
Fahrzeugbau/RS
Farbbänder/N
Fass/T
Fersengeld/RST
Fertigerzeugnis/Q
Festspiel/EPS
Festzug/TSp
findig/AC
Finsternis/q
Fjord/EPS
Fliegeroffizier/ES
Fließband/T
Folgenglied/RS
Fragesteller/NS
Fremdsprachenkenntnis/q
Fronarbeit/P
Fürstenhaus/Tp
Gartenhaus/Tp
Gaslicht/R
Gebet/EPS
Gedächtnis/Q
gefährdet/ACU
Gegenseite/N
Geldbrief/EPS
Geldschein/SPTE
Genf/R
Geograph/Pf
Gesamtkomplex/EPT
Geschäftsgeheimnis/Q
Geschoss/TEP
Gesetzesantrag/STp
Gesetzgebungsbefugnis/q
gewählt/AC
Glied/RST
Gottbekenntnis/Q
Granatäpfel/N
Gras/T
Gruppenbild/RT
Gummiparagraph/Pf
Hall/EPS
Handgelenk/EPS
Härtefall/Sp
Hauptbedingung/P
Haupthindernis/Q
hauptsächlich/AC
Hautarzt/T
Hebamme/N
Hehl/R
Hemmnis/q
Holographie/Nf
Honorar/EPS
Inhaltsverzeichnis/Q
inkonsistent/AC
Innenausschuss/Tp
Insulin/S
Ironiker/NS
Irrweg/EPST
Kalligraphie/Nf
Kalligraph/Pf
Kältegefühl/EPS
Kammgarn/EPS
Kanzelparagraph/Pf
Kartenspiel/EPRS
Kartographie/f
Kartograph/Pf
Kautschukmarkt/ST
Kerze/N
Kielraum/STp
Kirchenturm/S
Kitschroman/EPS
Kochkenntnis/q
kokett/AC
Kompliment/EPST
Konsumbedürfnis/Q
Körperreaktion/P
Kostüm/EPS
Krämpfe/N
Kreditbetrag/STp
Kriminalbeamte/NR
Ladenpreis/EPT
Landarbeiter/FNS
Lebensverhältnis/Q
lebhaft/AC
Leichenzug/STp
Lichtsatzanlage/N
Liefertermin/EPS
Lithographie/Nf
Machtbefugnis/q
Machtverhältnis/Q
Materialbild/RT
Materialhandlung/P
menschenunwürdig/AC
Mikrowelle/N
Millimeter/NS
Mindestmaß/ET
Minutenereignis/Q
Mitgliedsstaat/T
Mitwirkungsbefugnis/q
Montanvertrag/pT
Naturerlebnis/Q
Nuance/N
nüchtern/AC
Nullsummenspiel/EPS
Okkupant/P
Orgelklang/Sp
Orthographie/Nf
Paganini/S
Papiergeld/RST
Paragraph/Pf
Pinselstrich/EPT
Plakette/N
Polizeitrupp/EPS
Pornographie/Nf
Postgeheimnis/Q
prall/AC
Propagandafeldzug/STp
Prüfstein/EPT
Quellverzeichnis/Q
Quota/S
Räuber/NS
Räumungsbefehl/EPS
Rechtsbefugnis/q
Rindvieh/R
rissfest/AC
Saft/EST
Saisonschluss/Tp
Säugetier/EPS
Schächte/N
Schaltnetzteil/PS
Schankwirt/EPT
schlank/AC
Schockerlebnis/Q
Schraubendampfer/NS
Schulungsraum/STp
Schutzbefohlene/NR
Seelenleben/S
Seitenhieb/EPT
Selbsterkenntnis/q
Sicherheitsklausel/N
Sinnesänderung/P
sorgfältig/AC
Spezialhaus/Tp
Spottbild/RT
Spottgedicht/EPST
Sprachkenntnis/q
Sprengring/EPS
Staatslehre/N
Standardverzeichnis/Q
Stenographie/Nf
Steuerprozess/EPT
Strahlantrieb/EPS
Stromausfall/Sp
Stützpfeiler/S
Tagegeld/RS
tauglich/ACU
Telegraph/Pf
Terrasse/N
Tischgerät/EPST
Topographie/Nf
Traubensaft/S
Trauerspiel/EPS
Trickablauf/Sp
tückisch/AC
Tuff/EPS
Typographie/Nf
Typograph/Pf
Umfrageergebnis/Q
unerwartet/AC
Unkenntnis/q
Uraltparagraph/Pf
väterlich/AC
verletzbar/AC
Vernebelung/P
Verrechnungsstelle/N
Versorgungslager/NS
Versuchslauf/Sp
Vertragsverhältnis/Q
vierzig/R
Vogelmist/T
Vorort/EPST
wasserlöslich/AC
Weberbaum/STp
Weitblick/S
Weltkenntnis/q
Weltmachtpolitik/P
Willensstärke/N
willig/ACU
wulstig/AC
Zahlenverhältnis/Q
Zeichenbrett/RS
Zeitverlust/EPT
Zerstörungstrieb/EPT
Zinn/EPST
Zollhaus/Tp
zornentbrannt/AC
Zwangsherrschaft/P
